Virginia statutes. Title 8.7. Commercial Code — Warehouse Receipts, Bills of Lading and Other Documents of Title.
PART 6. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 8.7-601.
Lost, stolen or destroyed documents.

If a document has been lost, stolen or destroyed, a court may order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document and the bailee may without liability to any person comply with such order. If the document was negotiable, a court may not order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document without the claimant’s posting security unless it finds that any person who may suffer loss as a result of nonsurrender of possession or control of the document is adequately protected against the loss. If the document was not negotiable, the court may require security. The court may also in its discretion order payment of the bailee’s reasonable costs and attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection.

A bailee who, without court order, delivers goods to a person claiming under a missing negotiable document is liable to any person injured thereby. If the delivery is not in good faith, the bailee becomes liable for conversion. Delivery in good faith is not conversion if the claimant posts security with the bailee in an amount at least double the value of the goods at the time of posting to indemnify any person injured by the delivery who files a notice of claim within one year after the delivery.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-17; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200, in subsection (1), rewrote the second sentence, deleted “such security may be required at the discretion of” preceding “the court” and inserted “may require security” in the third sentence, and substituted “attorney’s fees in any action under this subsection” for “counsel fees” in the last sentence; and in subsection (2), divided the former first sentence into two sentences by substituting “If” for “and, if,” inserted “the bailee” in the second sentence, and deleted “if made in accordance with a filed classification or tariff or, where no classification or tariff is filed” following “is not conversion” in the last sentence.

§ 8.7-602.
Attachment of goods covered by a negotiable document.

Except where the document was originally issued upon delivery of the goods by a person who had no power to dispose of them, no lien attaches by virtue of any judicial process to goods in the possession of a bailee for which a negotiable document is outstanding unless possession or control of the document is first surrendered to the bailee or its negotiation is enjoined. The bailee shall not be compelled to deliver the goods pursuant to process until possession or control of the document is surrendered to him or the court. One who purchases the document for value without notice of the process or injunction takes free of the lien imposed by judicial process.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-28; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 divided the former first sentence into two sentences by substituting “The” for “and, the,” twice inserted “possession or control of,” deleted “of title” following “negotiable document” in the first sentence, deleted “impounded by” preceding “the court” in the second sentence, and made a minor stylistic change.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.5 Property Subject to Execution. Rendleman.

§ 8.7-603.
Conflicting claims; interpleader.

If more than one person claims title or possession of the goods, the bailee is excused from delivery until he has had a reasonable time to ascertain the validity of the adverse claims or to bring an action for interpleader. The bailee may assert an interpleader either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 61-19, 61-20; 1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200, in the first sentence, substituted “for interpleader” for “to compel all claimants to interplead and may compel such interpleader, whichever is appropriate,” and added the last sentence.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5. Parties. § 5.03 Multiple Parties. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.20 Interpleader.
Friend.